dictionaries/eu/index.aff
FLAG num
SFX 248    0       agoei/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoek/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoekin/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoendako/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoentzat/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoez/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoen/238      .
SFX 248    0       agogatik/243      .
SFX 248    0       agooi/243      .
SFX 248    0       agook/243      .
SFX 248    0       agookin/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoontzat/243      .
SFX 248    0       agootaz/243      .
SFX 248    0       agooz/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoon/243      .
SFX 248    0       agotzat/243      .
SFX 248    0       agok/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoz/243      .
SFX 248    0       agorekin/243      .
SFX 248    0       agorendako/243      .
SFX 248    0       agorentzat/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoren/238      .
SFX 248    0       agori/243      .
SFX 248    0       agorik/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoan/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoko/243      .
SFX 248    0       agoraino/243      .
SFX 248    0       agorantz/243      .
SFX 248    0       agorat/243      .
SFX 248    0       agora/243      .
SFX 248    0       agotik/243      .
SFX 248    0       arekin      .
SFX 248    0       arekiko/243      .
SFX 248    0       arendako/243      .
SFX 248    0       arentzat      .
SFX 248    0       arentzako/243      .
SFX 248    0       aren/238      .
SFX 248    0       arena      .
SFX 248    0       arenak      .
SFX 248    0       arenarekin      .
SFX 248    0       arenarendako/243      .
SFX 248    0       arenarentzat      .
SFX 248    0       arenari      .
SFX 248    0       arenaz      .
SFX 248    0       arenei      .
SFX 248    0       arenek      .
SFX 248    0       arenekin      .
SFX 248    0       arenendako/243      .
SFX 248    0       arenentzat      .
SFX 248    0       arenetaraino      .
SFX 248    0       arenetarantz      .
SFX 248    0       arenetarat      .
SFX 248    0       arenetara      .
SFX 248    0       arenetatik      .
SFX 248    0       arenetan      .
SFX 248    0       arenetarik      .
SFX 248    0       arenez      .
SFX 248    0       arengan      .
SFX 248    0       arengana      .
SFX 248    0       arenganaino      .
SFX 248    0       arenganantz      .
SFX 248    0       arengandik      .
SFX 248    0       arengatik      .
SFX 248    0       arenoi      .
SFX 248    0       arenok      .
SFX 248    0       arenokin      .
SFX 248    0       arenontzat      .
SFX 248    0       arenotaz      .
SFX 248    0       arenoz      .
SFX 248    0       areni      .
SFX 248    0       arenik      .
SFX 248    0       arenean      .
SFX 248    0       areneraino      .
SFX 248    0       arenerantz      .
SFX 248    0       arenerat      .
SFX 248    0       arenera      .
SFX 248    0       arenetik      .
SFX 248    0       ari      .
SFX 248    0       az      .
SFX 248    0       agan      .
SFX 248    0       agana      .
SFX 248    0       aganaino      .
SFX 248    0       aganantz      .
SFX 248    0       agandik      .
SFX 248    0       agatik      .
SFX 248    0       txo/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoa/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoak/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoarekin/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoarendako/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoarentzat/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoaren/238      .
SFX 248    0       txoari/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoaz/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoei/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoek/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoekin/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoendako/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoentzat/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoez/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoen/238      .
SFX 248    0       txogatik/243      .
SFX 248    0       txooi/243      .
SFX 248    0       txook/243      .
SFX 248    0       txookin/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoontzat/243      .
SFX 248    0       txootaz/243      .
SFX 248    0       txooz/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoon/243      .
SFX 248    0       txotzat/243      .
SFX 248    0       txok/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoz/243      .
SFX 248    0       txorekin/243      .
SFX 248    0       txorendako/243      .
SFX 248    0       txorentzat/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoren/238      .
SFX 248    0       txori/243      .
SFX 248    0       txorik/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoan/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoko/243      .
SFX 248    0       txoraino/243      .
SFX 248    0       txorantz/243      .
SFX 248    0       txorat/243      .
SFX 248    0       txora/243      .
SFX 248    0       txotik/243      .
SFX 248    0       tzar      .
SFX 248    0       tzarra      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrak      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrarekin      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrarendako/243      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrarentzat      .
SFX 248    0       tzarraren/238      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrari      .
SFX 248    0       tzarraz      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrei      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrek      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrekin      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrendako/243      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrentzat      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrez      .
SFX 248    0       tzarren/238      .
SFX 248    0       tzarroi      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrok      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrokin      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrontzat      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrotaz      .
SFX 248    0       tzarroz      .
SFX 248    0       tzarron      .
SFX 248    0       tzarri      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrik      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrean      .
SFX 248    0       tzarreko/243      .
SFX 248    0       tzarreraino      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrerantz      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrerat      .
SFX 248    0       tzarrera      .
SFX 248    0       tzarretik      .
SFX 248    0       tzargatik      .
SFX 248    0       tzartzat      .
SFX 248    0       dik      .
SFX 248    0       diko/243      .
SFX 248    0       ean      .
SFX 248    0       ekoago/243      .
SFX 248    0       ekoegi      .
SFX 248    0       eraino      .
SFX 248    0       erainoko/243      .
SFX 248    0       erantz      .
SFX 248    0       erantzago/243      .
SFX 248    0       erantzegi      .
SFX 248    0       eranzko/243      .
SFX 248    0       erat      .
SFX 248    0       erako/243      .
SFX 248    0       era      .
SFX 248    0       erago/243      .
SFX 248    0       etik      .
SFX 248    0       etiko/243      .
